Florida, session 2026, SB732.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âSection 411.2035, Florida Statutes, is amended 20 to read: 21 411.2035âDangers of abusive head trauma shaking infants and 22 young children; requirements for distributing parent education 23 materials brochures.â 24 (1)âEvery hospital, birthing facility, and provider of home 25 birth which has maternity and newborn services shall provide to 26 the parents of a newborn, before they take their newborn home 27 from the hospital or birthing facility, written information with 28 an explanation concerning the dangers of shaking infants and 29 young children. 30 (1)(2)âThe Department of Health shall adopt evidence-based 31 parent education materials prepare a brochure that describe 32 describes the dangers of abusive head trauma, including shaken 33 baby syndrome shaking infants and young children. The parent 34 education materials may be provided using written, visual, or 35 electronic applications. The materials description must include, 36 but need not be limited to, information concerning all of the 37 following: 38 (a)âThe grave effects of shaking infants and young 39 children., information concerning 40 (b)âAppropriate ways to manage the causes that can lead a 41 person to shake or harm infants and young children, including 42 normal infant crying, fussing, and other causes. 43 (c)âa discussion of Ways to reduce the risks that can lead 44 a person to shake or harm infants and young children. 45 (d)âEvidence-based practices for safe infant sleep and 46 avoiding the dangers associated with unsafe sleep environments 47 for infants. 48 (e)âInformation on the importance of carefully selecting a 49 trusted and responsible caregiver, including warning signs of 50 potential risk factors. 51 (2)(a)âThe evidence-based parent education materials 52 adopted by the department under subsection (1) must be 53 distributed as follows: 54 1.âEach hospital, birth center, and home birth provider 55 providing maternity, prenatal, and newborn services shall 56 provide the parent education materials to the parents or 57 caregivers of a newborn within the first 2 weeks after the birth 58 of the infant. 59 2.âChildbirth educators, pediatric physician practices, 60 home visiting programs, and obstetrician practices shall provide 61 the parent education materials to the expectant parents or 62 caregivers receiving education or health care services or, if 63 parents or caregivers have already received the parent education 64 materials, reiterate or reinforce the information covered by 65 such materials. 66 3.âThe department shall adopt a statewide multimedia public 67 education campaign to prevent instances of abusive head trauma, 68 including shaken baby syndrome, using the parent education 69 materials developed under subsection (1) or the information 70 covered by such materials. 71 (b)âThe department shall implement a multi-year phase-in 72 plan for the distribution of the parent education materials, 73 beginning with the counties with the six highest birth rates. 74 (3)âThis section does not preclude a hospital, a birth 75 center birthing facility, or a home birth provider, a childbirth 76 educator, a pediatric physician practice, a home visiting 77 program, or an obstetrician practice from providing the parent 78 education materials notice required under this section as an 79 addendum to, or in connection with, any other required 80 information. 81 (4)âA cause of action does not accrue against the state or 82 any subdivision or agency thereof or any hospital, birth center, 83 home birth birthing facility or home-birth provider, childbirth 84 educator, pediatric physician practice, home visiting program, 85 or obstetrician practice for failure to give or receive the 86 information required under this section. 87 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.